Massachusetts, session 194th, H524.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by:
(a) striking out, in lines 1 to 2, the words “between the minimum and maximum ages
established for school attendance by the board of education” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:
“ages of 6 and 18, having completed at least the twelfth grade, high school equivalency
test, or whichever comes first”.; and
(b) inserting after the word “herewith”, in line 58, the following words:
of 4

“, provided that no student over the age of 16 shall face criminal penalties for failure to
attend school through the mandatory age for school attendance”.
SECTION 2. Section 1B of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting before the period, in line 120, the following words:
“, provided, however, that all children under the age of 18 shall be required to attend
school if they have not graduated from high school or completed the high school equivalency
test”.
SECTION 3. Chapter 76 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 21 the following section:
Section 22. Commission to Study Barriers to High School Graduation.
(a) Establishment of Commission. There shall be a special commission, referred to as
the ‘High School Graduation Commission’. Said commission shall—
(1) investigate and study barriers to high school graduation; and
(2) make recommendations regarding the identification of students at risk of dropping
out of high school and the targeting of services and programs that will ensure all students can
graduate from high school.
(b) Members.
(1) The commission shall be chaired by the secretary of education or the secretary’s
designee.
of 4

(2) The commissioner of the department of higher education or the commissioner’s
designee and the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education or the
commissioner’s designee shall each be members.
(3) The governor shall appoint 4 members, one of whom shall be nominated by the
Massachusetts Teachers Association and one of whom shall be nominated by the American
Federation of Teachers of Massachusetts.
(4) The speaker of the house shall appoint one member and the senate president shall
appoint one member.
(c) Reporting Requirements. The commission shall report its findings and any
legislation necessary to implement said findings to the governor, the clerks of the senate and
house of representatives, the senate and house of representatives committees on ways and means,
the senate and house of representatives committees on education, six months upon effective date
of the act. The commission report shall include but not be limited to: an analysis of the student
populations who are at the highest risk of dropping out, mechanisms to identify students who are
at risk of dropping out, barriers to high school graduation and evidence based services that
reduce and eliminate barriers to high school graduation. In making its recommendations the
commission shall consider among other issues—
(1) grades, attendance patterns, disciplinary issues, family and environmental factors,
breaks or gaps in education, teen parenthood, limited English proficiency and disabilities that
may indicate a student is at risk of not completing high school;
(2) mechanisms and information technology that can be used to identify students at
risk of dropping out and track students’ progress once identified;
of 4

(3) appropriate benchmarks for periodic review of students’ progress;
(4) wrap around support services designed to effectively target and alleviate or
eliminate barriers for students completing high school;
(5) methods to reengage students who have left school;
(6) dedicated tutoring and academic services for students who have gaps in education
as a result of moving, illness, absences, disciplinary issues or immigration;
(7) emotional support services and resources for students at risk of dropping out; and
(8) recommendations for mechanisms to emphasize the importance of high school
graduation for all students.

SECTION 4. Sections 1 to 3 of this Act shall become effective on the next school year
calendar after passage.
of 4